District of Columbia statutes.
42-3671.03

General requirements of disclosures.

(a)

The lessor shall disclose to the consumer the information required by § 42-3671.04. In a transaction involving more than one lessor, only one lessor need make the disclosures, but all lessors shall be bound by the disclosures.

(b)

The disclosures shall be made at or before consummation.

(c)

The disclosures shall be made clearly and conspicuously in writing and a copy of the lease-purchase agreement shall be provided to the consumer. The disclosures required under § 42-3671.04 shall be made on the face of the contract above the line for the consumer’s signature.

(d)

If a disclosure becomes inaccurate as the result of an action, occurrence, or agreement by the consumer after delivery of the required disclosures, the resulting inaccuracy shall not be a violation of this chapter.

(e)

The lease-purchase agreement shall include a statement indicating all fees that are charged under the lease-purchase agreement separately, including any other charges such as taxes, late payment fees, default fees, processing fees, pickup fees, fees for optional services or products, or reinstatement fees.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-99, § 4, 49 DCR 1000